West Virginia, session 2025, SB385.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Medicine. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on April 1, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-23 of this code, relating to the Board of Medicine (waiver of initial licensing fees for certain initial licensure applicants, 11 CSR 13), is authorized.